Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-3207
Award; recipient; requirements; termination.

(1) A recipient of an award shall:

(a) Attend all required courses regularly;

(b) Meet with an assigned advisor at regular intervals to discuss academic progress and to develop a job-search plan; and

(c) Maintain good academic standing at the eligible postsecondary educational institution without any disciplinary action by such institution.

(2) An award may be terminated if such person fails to meet the requirements of this section.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 34.